Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
CHAPTER 12 Trusts

Cross references.

Taxation of fiduciaries, §

48-7-22

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1991, p. 810, repealed and reenacted the former chapter, effective July 1, 1991.
The former chapter consisted of Code Sections 53-12-1 through 53-12-156, and was based on Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 228, § 5; Code 1863, § 3292; Code 1868, § 3304; Code 1873, § 3380; Code 1882, § 3380; Civil Code 1895, § 3205; Civil Code 1910, § 3789; Code 1933, §§ 108-504, 108-608, 108-609, 108-610; Ga. L. 1950, p. 310, § 1; Ga. L. 1961, p. 207, §§ 5, 6; Ga. L. 1971, p. 428, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1971, p. 430, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1971, p. 643, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1973, p. 844, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1974, p. 440, § 7; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1527, § 3; Ga. L. 1977, p. 719, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 472, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 53; Ga. L. 1983, p. 884, § 4-1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 53; Ga. L. 1987, p. 191, § 9; Ga. L. 1988, p. 13, § 53; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1939, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 53; Ga. L. 1989, p. 946, §§ 116-118; Ga. L. 1990, p. 667, § 2.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1, effective July 1, 2010, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this chapter and enacted the current chapter. The former chapter consisted of Code Sections 53-12-1 through 53-12-7 (Article 1),
53-12-20 through 53-12-28 (Article 2),
53-12-50 through 53-12-59 (Article 3), 53-12-70 through 53-12-74 (Article 4), 53-12-90 through 53-12-94 (Article 5), 53-12-110 through 53-12-133 (Article 6), 53-12-150 through 53-12-153 (Article 7), 53-12-170
through 53-12-173, 53-12-173.1, and 53-12-174 through 53-12-176 (Article 8), 53-12-190 through 53-12-199 (Article 9), 53-12-210 through 53-12-219 (Article 10), 53-12-230 through 53-12-234 (Article 11), 53-12-250 through 53-12-264 (Article 12), 53-12-280 through 53-12-290 (Article 13), 53-12-300 through 53-12-302 (Article 14), 53-12-320 through 53-12-330 (Article 15), 53-12-350 through 53-12-394 (Article 16),
relating to trusts, and was based on
Ga. L. 1991, p. 810, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1053, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1438, § 3; Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, §§ 4, 11-14; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1323, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 53; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3; Ga. L. 2002, p. 788, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 854, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1316, § 7; Ga. L. 2003, p. 794, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 14; Ga. L. 2005, p. 583, §§ 2-6/HB 406; Ga. L. 2006, p. 805, § 23/SB 534.

Table of Comparable Provisions for Chapter 12 of Title 53
Former Code Sections to Revised Code Sections

This table lists each Code section in the former version of Chapter 12 of this title as such existed on June 30, 2010, and comparable provisions in the version of Chapter 12 which became effective July 1, 2010.
It is intended to assist the user who is familiar with the former chapter to find comparable new provisions.

1991 Trust Act 2010 Trust Code —- —- 53-12-1 53-12-1 53-12-2 53-12-2 53-12-3 53-12-1 53-12-4 53-12-6 53-12-5 53-12-7 53-12-6 53-12-201(b) 53-12-7 53-12-3 Article 2 53-12-20 53-12-20 53-12-21 53-12-21 53-12-22 53-12-23 53-12-23 53-12-22(a) 53-12-24 53-12-200 53-12-25 53-12-26 53-12-26 none 53-12-27 53-12-27 53-12-28 53-12-80 Article 3 53-12-50 53-12-150 53-12-51 53-12-151 53-12-52 53-12-152 53-12-53 53-12-153 53-12-54 53-12-154 53-12-55 53-12-155 53-23-56 53-12-156 53-12-57 53-12-157 53-12-58 53-12-158 53-12-59 53-12-159 Article 4 53-12-70 53-12-100 53-12-71 53-12-101 53-12-72 53-12-102 53-12-73 53-12-103 Article 5 53-12-90 53-12-2(5) 53-12-91 53-12-130 53-12-92 53-12-131 53-12-93 53-12-132 53-12-94 53-12-133 Article 6 =thd2 Part 1 53-12-110 53-12-170 53-12-111 53-12-170 53-12-112 53-12-171 53-12-113 53-12-172 53-12-114 53-12-173 53-12-115 53-12-174 53-12-116 none Part 2 53-12-120 53-12-180 53-12-121 53-12-181 53-12-122 53-12-182 53-12-123 53-12-184 53-12-124 53-12-190 53-12-125 53-12-191 53-12-126 53-12-192 53-12-127 53-12-194 53-12-128 53-12-195 53-12-129 53-12-193 53-12-130 53-12-183 53-12-131 none 53-12-132 53-12-184, 53-12-194 53-12-133 53-12-184, 53-12-195 Article 7 53-12-150 53-12-40 53-12-151 53-12-41 53-12-152 53-12-63, 53-12-64 53-12-153 53-12-62 Article 8 53-12-170 53-12-201 53-12-171 53-12-202 53-12-172 53-12-204 53-12-173 53-12-210, 53-12-211 53-12-173.1 53-12-214 53-12-174 53-12-203 53-12-175 53-12-220 53-12-221 53-12-221 Article 9 53-12 190 53-12-240, 53-12-243, 53-12-244 53-12-191 53-12-300 53-12-192 53-12-301 53-12-193 53-12-302 53-12-194 53-12-303 53-12-195 53-12-304 53-12-196 53-12-305 53-12-197 53-12-306 53-12-198 53-12-307 53-12-199 53-12-308 Article 10 53-12-210 53-12-381 53-12-211 53-12-247, 53-12-360 53-12-212 53-12-420, 53-12-421, 53-12-422, 53-12-423 53-12-213 53-12-400, 53-12-401, 53-12-402 53-12-214 53-12-410 53-12-215 53-12-422 53-12-216 53-12-412 53-12-217 53-12-426, 53-12-427 53-12-218 53-12-428 53-12-219 53-12-450, 53-12-451, 53-12-452, 53-12-453, 53-12-454 53-12-220 53-12-361 53-12-221 53-12-362 53-12-222 53-12-363 Article 11 53-12-230 53-12-261(a) 53-12-231 53-12-263 53-12-232 53-12-261, 53-12-262 53-12-233 none 53-12-234 53-12-264 Article 12 53-12-250 none 53-12-251 none 53-12-252 none 53-12-253 none 53-12-254 none 53-12-255 none 53-12-256 none 53-12-257 none 53-12-258 none 53-12-259 none 53-12-260 none 53-12-261 none 53-12-262 none 53-12-263 53-7-45 53-12-264 none 53-12-265 53-12-270 Article 13 53-12-280 none 53-12-281 none 53-12-282 none 53-12-283 none 53-12-284 none 53-12-285 none 53-12-286 none 53-12-287 53-12-340, 53-12-429 53-12-288 none 53-12-289 none Article 14 53-12-300 53-12-290 53-12-301 53-12-291 53-12-302 53-12-292 Article 15 (Repealed by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1323, § 1) Article 16 =thd2 Part 1 53-12-350 none 53-12-351 none 53-12-352 none 53-12-353 none Part 2 53-12-370 53-12-320, 53-12-323 53-12-371 53-12-320 53-12-372 none 53-12-373 none 53-12-374 none 53-12-375 none 53-12-376 none Part 3 53-12-390 53-12-2(4) 53-12-391 53-12-320, 53-12-321 53-12-392 53-12-322, 53-12-323 53-12-393 53-12-323 53-12-394 53-12-323

Click to view

Revised Code Sections to Former Code Sections

This table lists each Code section in the version of Chapter 12 of this title which became effective July 1, 2010, and comparable provisions in the former version of Chapter 12 as such existed on June 30, 2010.

2010 Trust Code 1991 Trust Act —- —- 53-12-1 53-12-1, 53-12-3 53-12-2 53-12-2 53-12-3 53-12-7 53-12-4 none 53-12-5 none 53-12-6 53-12-4 53-12-7 53-12-5 Article 2 53-12-20 53-12-20 53-12-21 53-12-21 53-12-22 53-12-23, 53-4-68 53-12-23 53-12-22 53-12-24 none 53-12-25 none 53-12-26 53-12-25 53-12-27 53-12-27 53-12-28 none Article 3 53-12-40 53-12-150 53-12-41 53-12-151 53-12-42 none 53-12-43 none 53-12-44 none 53-12-45 none Article 4 53-12-60 none 53-12-61 none 53-12-62 53-12-153 53-12-63 53-12-152(b) 53-12-64 53-12-152(a) 53-12-65 none Article 5 53-12-80 53-12-28 53-12-81 none 53-12-82 none 53-12-83 none Article 6 =thd2 Part 1 53-12-100 53-12-70 53-12-101 53-12-71 53-12-102 53-12-72 53-12-103 53-12-73 Part 2 53-12-120 none Article 7 53-12-130 53-12-91 53-12-131 53-12-92 53-12-132 53-12-93 53-12-133 53-12-94 Article 8 53-12-150 53-12-50 53-12-151 53-12-51 53-12-152 53-12-52 53-12-153 53-12-53 53-12-154 53-12-54 53-12-155 53-12-55 53-12-156 53-12-56 53-12-157 53-12-57 53-12-158 53-12-58 53-12-159 53-12-59 Article 9 53-12-170 53-12-110, 53-12-111 53-12-171 53-12-112 53-12-172 53-12-113 53-12-173 53-12-114 53-12-174 53-12-115 53-12-175 none Article 10 =thd2 Part 1 53-12-180 53-12-120 53-12-181 53-12-121 53-12-182 53-12-122 53-12-183 53-12-130 53-12-184 53-12-123, 53-12-133 Part 2 53-12-190 53-12-124 53-12-191 53-12-125 53-12-192 53-12-126 53-12-193 53-12-129 53-12-194 53-12-127, 53-12-132 53-12-195 53-12-128, 53-12-133 Article 11 =thd2 Part 1 53-12-200 53-12-24 53-12-201 53-12-170, 53-12-6 53-12-202 53-12-171 53-12-203 53-12-174 53-12-204 53-12-172 Part 2 53-12-210 53-12-173 53-12-211 53-12-173 53-12-212 none 53-12-213 none 53-12-214 53-12-173.1 Part 3 53-12-220 53-12-175 53-12-221 53-12-176 Article 12 53-12-230 53-7-73, 53-12-190(b) 53-12-231 53-7-73, 53-12-190(b) 53-12-232 none Article 13 =thd2 Part 1 53-12-240 53-12-190(a) 53-12-241 none 53-12-242 none 53-12-243 53-12-190(b) 53-12-244 53-12-190(c) 53-12-245 none 53-12-246 53-12-173 53-12-247 53-12-211(b) Part 2 53-12-260 none 53-12-261 53-12-230, 53-12-232 53-12-262 53-12-232 53-12-263 53-12-231 53-12-264 53-12-234 Part 3 53-12-270 53-12-265 Part 4 53-12-280 none Part 5 53-12-290 53-12-300 53-12-291 53-12-301 53-12-292 53-12-302 Article 14 53-12-300 53-12-191 53-12-301 53-12-192 53-12-302 53-12-193 53-12-303 53-12-194 53-12-304 53-12-195 53-12-305 53-12-196 53-12-306 53-12-197 53-12-307 53-12-198 53-12-308 53-12-199 Article 15 53-12-320 53-12-391, 53-12-370, 53-12-371 53-12-321 53-12-391 53-12-322 53-12-392 53-12-323 53-12-392, 53-12-393, 53-12-394 Article 16 =thd2 Part 1 53-12-340 53-12-287 53-12-341 none 53-12-342 none 53-12-343 none 53-12-344 none 53-12-345 53-12-290 Part 2 53-12-360 53-12-211 53-12-361 53-12-220 53-12-362 53-12-221 53-12-363 53-12-222 53-12-364 none Article 17 =thd2 Part 1 53-12-380 none 53-12-381 53-12-210 Part 2 53-12-390 none 53-12-391 53-12-219(e) Part 3 53-12-400 53-12-213 53-12-401 53-12-213 53-12-402 53-12-213 Part 4 =thd2 Subpart 1 53-12-410 53-12-214 53-12-411 none 53-12-412 53-12-216 Subpart 2 53-12-420 53-12-212(b) 53-12-421 53-12-212(a) 53-12-422 53-12-212(a), 53-12-215 53-12-423 53-12-212(b) 53-12-424 none 53-12-425 none 53-12-426 53-12-217 53-12-427 53-12-217 53-12-428 53-12-218 53-12-429 53-12-287(d) 53-12-430 none 53-12-431 none Article 18 53-12-450 53-12-219 53-12-451 53-12-219 53-12-452 53-12-219 53-12-453 53-12-219 53-12-454 53-12-219 53-12-455 none

Click to view

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 40 Mercer L. Rev. 471 (1988).

For annual survey of wills, trusts, and administration of estates law, see 41 Mercer L. Rev. 411 (1989).

For annual survey of wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 42 Mercer L. Rev. 491 (1990).

For article, “The Georgia Trust Act,” 28 Ga. St. B.J. 95 (1991).

For annual survey of wills, trusts, and administration, see 43 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (1991).

For note on 1991 revision of this chapter, see 8 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 201 (1992).

For annual survey article on law of wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 45 Mercer L. Rev. 475 (1993).

For annual survey of law on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 365 (2010).